fr: Type de mixeur: Analogique; Battle; Club; Contrôleur DJ; Numérique; Non alimenté; Alimenté; Rotatif; Scratch; Autre
fi: Sekoitintyyppi: Analoginen; Taistelu; Club; DJ-ohjain; Digitaalinen; Ei virtalähdettä; Virtalähde; Pyörivä; Scratch; Muu
ja: ミキサータイプ: アナログ; バトル; クラブ; DJコントローラー; デジタル; 電源なし; 電源付き; ロータリー; スクラッチ; その他
it: Tipo di mixer: Analog; Battle; Club; Console DJ; Digital; Non alimentato; Alimentato; A rotazione; Scratch; Altro
ru: Тип микшера: Аналоговые; Батл; Club; DJ-контроллер; Цифровой; Неактивный; Активный; Вращающийся; Скрэтч; Другой
de: Mischpulttyp: Analog; Battle; Club; DJ-Controller; Digital; Ohne Power; Mit Power; Rotierend; Scratch; Sonstiges
es: Tipo de mezcladora: Analógico; Batalla; Club; Controlador de DJ; Digital; Sin alimentación; Alimentado; Giratoria; Rascador; Otros
pt-BR: Tipo de misturador: Analógico; Batalha; Club; Controlador de DJ; Digital; Sem plataforma; Com plataforma; Rotativo; Artesanal; Outro
pt-PT: Tipo de mesa de mistura: Analógico; De batalha; De discoteca; Controlador de DJ; Digital; Sem amplificadores; Com amplificadores; Rotativo; Scratch; Outro
da: Mixertype: Analog; Battle; Club; DJ-controller; Digital; Ikke-strømdrevet; Strømdrevet; Roterende; Scratch; Andet
el: Τύπος μίκτη: Αναλογικό; Battle; Club; Ελεγκτήρας DJ; Ψηφιακός; Μη τροφοδοτούμενος; Τροφοδοτούμενος; Περιστροφικός; Scratch; Άλλο
vi: Loại máy trộn: Analog; Battle; Câu lạc bộ; Bộ điều khiển DJ; Kỹ thuật số; Không khuếch đại công suất; Có khuếch đại công suất; Xoay; Chà; Khác
nl: Mixertype: Analoog; Battle; Club; DJ-controller; Digitaal; Zonder voeding; Met voeding; Roterend; Scratch; Andere
nb: Blandertype: Analog; Slag; Klubb; DJ-kontroller; Digital; Ikke-elektrisk; Elektrisk; Roterende; Ripe; Annet
ro-RO: Tip mixer: Analogic; Battle; Club; DJ controller; Digital; Nealimentat; Alimentat; Rotativ; Scratch; Altele
sl-SI: Vrsta mešalne mize: Analogna; Tekmovalni; Klubski; DJ krmilnik; Digitalno; Brez napajanja; Električen; Krožna; Za praskanje; Drugo
th: ประเภทมิกเซอร์: อนาล็อก; แบทเทิล; คลับ; ควบคุมโดยดีเจ; ดิจิทัล; ไม่มีแอมป์ขยายเสียง; มีแอมป์ขยายเสียง; โรตารี; สแครทช์; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Typ mixpultu: Analógový; Battle; Klub; DJ-ský ovládač; Digitálny; Bez napájania; Napájaný; Rotačný; Scratch; Iné
pl: Typ mieszalnika: Analogowy; Bitwa; Klub; Kontroler DJ; Cyfrowe; Niezasilany; Zasilany; Rotacyjny; Zarys; Inne
zh-CN: 混合器类型: 模拟; Battle; Club; DJ 控制器; 数字化; 非电源型; 电源型; 旋转型; Scratch; 其他
zh-TW: 混音器類型: 類比; 戰鬥; 俱樂部; DJ 控制器; 數位; 被動; 主動; 旋轉; 刮盤; 其他
ko: 믹서 유형: 아날로그; 배틀; 클럽; DJ 컨트롤러; 디지털; 무전원; 전원; 회전; 스크래치; 기타
lt-LT: Garso maišytuvo tipas: Analoginis; „Battle“; „Club“; DJ kontroleris; Skaitmeninė; Be stiprintuvo; Su stiprintuvu; Rotacinis; „Scratch“; Kita
tr: Mikser Tipi: Analog; Savaş; Kulüp; DJ kontrolcüsü; Dijital; Güçlendirilmemiş; Güçlendirilmiş; Döner; Çizik; Diğer
en: Mixer type: Analog; Battle; Club; DJ controller; Digital; Non-powered; Powered; Rotary; Scratch; Other
hu: Keverő típusa: Analóg; Battle; Club; DJ-vezérlő; Digitális; Nem elektromos; Elektromos; Forgó; Scratch; Egyéb
sv: Mixertyp: Analog; Kamp; Klubb; DJ-kontroller; Digital; Ej driven; Drivs; Roterande; Repa; Övrigt
hr-HR: Vrsta miksete: Analogni; Battle; Club; DJ kontroler; Digitalna; Bez napajanja; Na struju; Rotacijska; Scratch; Ostalo
bg-BG: Тип миксер: Аналогов; Battle; Клуб; DJ контролер; Цифров; Без захранване; Със захранване; Ротационен; Скреч; Други
cs: Typ mixážního pultu: Analogový; Battle; Club; DJ kontroler; Digitální; Bez napájení; Napájeno; Rotační; Scratch; Jiné